Florida, session 2026, SB1064.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âThe Legislature finds that the stateâs judges, 25 prosecutors, law enforcement officers, and other public servants 26 play an essential role in the functioning of the government of 27 this state and that the nature of their public duties regularly 28 places them in danger of death, serious physical injury, 29 threats, intimidation, and other reprisals. Violence, threats, 30 and intimidation targeted at such public servants and their 31 families is on the rise. Technology has broadened access to the 32 personal information of such persons, defined in this act as 33 âprotected information,â and can be and has been used to 34 facilitate violence, threats, and intimidation. Accordingly, the 35 provisions set forth herein are both necessary and appropriate 36 to protect the privacy, safety, and security of such public 37 servants and to prevent interference in the administration of 38 justice and the operation of government in this state. 39 Section 2.âSection 111.101, Florida Statutes, is created to 40 read: 41 111.101âNondisclosure of public servantsâ personal 42 information.â 43 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 44 (a)ââAssigneeâ means a person or an entity to whom a 45 covered personâs right to bring a civil action for a violation 46 of paragraph (2)(b) has been assigned, in writing, by the 47 covered person or his or her authorized agent. 48 (b)ââAuthorized agentâ means any of the following persons 49 or entities authorized to submit or revoke a request for 50 nondisclosure of protected information on behalf of a covered 51 person and to engage in communications and enforcement related 52 thereto: 53 1.âA designated trustee or other agent acting pursuant to a 54 written power of attorney or other legal instrument on behalf of 55 a covered person who is physically or mentally incapacitated. 56 2.âA parent or legal guardian acting on behalf of a child 57 who is a minor and otherwise entitled to nondisclosure pursuant 58 to this section. 59 3.âA person or an entity that has been appointed pursuant 60 to a written power of attorney by a covered person to act on the 61 covered personâs behalf with respect to this section. 62 4.âAn agent acting on behalf of a federal judge, a designee 63 of the United States Marshals Service, or the clerk of any 64 United States District Court. 65 (c)ââCovered personâ means any of the following persons: 66 1.âActive or former sworn law enforcement personnel or 67 active or former civilian personnel employed by a law 68 enforcement agency, including law enforcement officers; 69 correctional officers; correctional probation officers; 70 personnel of the Department of Children and Families whose 71 duties include the investigation of abuse, neglect, 72 exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal activities; or 73 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 74 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 75 enforcement or child support enforcement. 76 2.âCurrent or former federal judges, justices of the 77 Supreme Court, district court of appeal judges, circuit court 78 judges, or county court judges, and current judicial assistants. 79 3.âCurrent or former general magistrates, special 80 magistrates, judges of compensation claims, administrative law 81 judges of the Division of Administrative Hearings, or child 82 support enforcement hearing officers. 83 4.âCurrent or former state attorneys, assistant state 84 attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 85 prosecutors. 86 5.âCurrent or former juvenile probation officers, juvenile 87 probation supervisors, detention superintendents, assistant 88 detention superintendents, juvenile justice detention officers I 89 and II, juvenile justice detention officer supervisors, juvenile 90 justice residential officers, juvenile justice residential 91 officer supervisors I and II, juvenile justice counselors, 92 juvenile justice counselor supervisors, human services counselor 93 administrators, senior human services counselor administrators, 94 rehabilitation therapists, or social services counselors of the 95 Department of Juvenile Justice. 96 6.âCurrent or former public defenders, assistant public 97 defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, or 98 assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel. 99 7.âIndividuals who hold or held elected public office under 100 the laws of this state at the state, county, or municipal level, 101 including members of the Legislature, statewide officers, county 102 commissioners, sheriffs, mayors, city council members, or 103 individuals holding similar positions. 104 8.âA child of a person identified in subparagraphs 1.-7., 105 until such child attains 26 years of age. 106 9.âA person sharing custody of a minor child with a person 107 identified in subparagraphs 1.-7. 108 10.âA blood or legal relative sharing a primary residence 109 with a person identified in subparagraphs 1.-7. 110 (d)ââData brokerâ means a person or an entity that 111 knowingly collects or obtains the protected information of a 112 consumer and then discloses that information to a third party. 113 The term does not include any governmental agency or its 114 representatives acting in their official capacity. 115 (e)ââDiscloseâ means to solicit, sell, manufacture, give, 116 provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, post, publish, 117 distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, 118 offer, or include within a searchable list or database, 119 regardless of whether any other person or entity has actually 120 searched such list or database for the information. 121 (f)ââFederal judgeâ has the same meaning as in the Daniel 122 Anderl Judicial Security and Privacy Act of 2022, Pub. L. No. 123 117-263, div. E, title LIX, subtitle D, Dec. 23, 2022, 136 Stat. 124 3458. 125 (g)ââHome addressâ means the dwelling location at which a 126 person resides and includes the personâs physical address, 127 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 128 plot identification number, legal property description, 129 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, or any other 130 descriptive property information that may reveal the home 131 address. 132 (h)ââHome telephone numberâ means any telephone number used 133 primarily for personal communications or associated with 134 personal communications devices, including a landline or 135 cellular number. 136 (i)ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned to 137 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, or 8320. 138 (j)ââProtected informationâ means: 139 1.âA home address, including a primary residence or 140 secondary residences. 141 2.âA home telephone number. 142 3.âA personal e-mail address. 143 4.âA social security number or driver license number. 144 5.âA license plate number or other unique identifiers of a 145 vehicle owned, leased, or regularly used by the covered person. 146 6.âThe mobile advertising ID or any other unique identifier 147 used for tracking cellular phones or smart devices regularly 148 used by the covered person. 149 (2)âNONDISCLOSURE OF PROTECTED INFORMATION.â 150 (a)âA covered person or his or her authorized agent seeking 151 to prohibit the disclosure by a data broker of the protected 152 information of the covered person must provide written notice to 153 the data broker referencing this section and requesting that the 154 data broker cease the disclosure of the covered personâs 155 protected information, as described in such notice. 156 (b)âNot later than 10 business days following physical or 157 electronic receipt of such written notice, a data broker may not 158 disclose or redisclose, including, but not limited to, on the 159 Internet, the personâs protected information set forth in such 160 notice. 161 (c)âFor receipt of such written notices from or on behalf 162 of covered persons, a data broker may provide an e-mail address 163 for receipt of written notices under this subsection, provided 164 that the e-mail address: 165 1.âIs clearly and publicly published in a privacy policy on 166 the data brokerâs website; 167 2.âDoes not change without at least 30 daysâ notice to be 168 communicated in the privacy policy; and 169 3.âIs able to receive any written notice delivered by e 170 mail. 171 (3)âENFORCEMENT.â 172 (a)âA data broker that violates paragraph (2)(b) shall be 173 liable to the covered person or the covered personâs assignee, 174 either of whom may bring a civil action in circuit court. 175 (b)âIn any judicial proceeding initiated pursuant to 176 paragraph (a), the standard of fault is ordinary negligence, and 177 it is not a defense to liability in such proceeding that the 178 covered personâs protected information is or was available to 179 the public from other sources or available by inspection of 180 public records. For the purpose of determining whether the 181 covered personâs protected information has been disclosed in 182 violation of paragraph (2)(b), a party accessing a data brokerâs 183 website or other products or services may not, as a result of 184 such access, be deemed to have agreed on behalf of the covered 185 person or the covered personâs assignee to any website terms and 186 conditions, including waivers of claims or limitations of 187 liability, with respect to the covered personâs or the covered 188 personâs assigneeâs rights under this section. Prior 189 verification of a covered personâs status is not required for 190 the notice under paragraph (2)(a) to be effective, but it is an 191 affirmative defense to liability that such person is not a 192 covered person. 193 (c)âA disclosure of protected information is not a 194 violation of this section if the disclosure is: 195 1.âMade with the express authorization of the covered 196 person, contingent upon such authorization being provided 197 subsequent to the relevant nondisclosure request described in 198 paragraph (2)(a); or 199 2.âFor the sole purpose of facilitating a transaction 200 initiated by the covered person. 201 (d)âFor violations of paragraph (2)(b), the court shall 202 award: 203 1.âThe greater of actual damages or liquidated damages 204 computed at the rate of $1,000 for each violation of paragraph 205 (2)(b). 206 2.âPunitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless 207 disregard of the law. 208 3.âReasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs 209 reasonably incurred. 210 4.âAny other preliminary or equitable relief as the court 211 determines to be appropriate. 212 (4)âCONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY.â 213 (a)âThis section shall be liberally construed in order to 214 accomplish its purpose. 215 (b)âIf any provision of this section or its application to 216 any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does 217 not affect other provisions or applications of this section 218 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 219 application, and to this end the provisions of this section are 220 severable. 221 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect January 15, 2027.